Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB432.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Maternal Care Access Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"At-risk." A geographic area that has a limited number of hospitals providing obstetric care, birth centers, obstetrician gynecologists and certified nurse midwives."Average childbearing age." Women of ages ranging from 10 to 60 years of age.12345678910111213141516 "Birth center." An entity licensed as a birth center under the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act."Department." The Department of Health of the Commonwealth."Distressed hospital." A hospital that:(1) had a negative profit margin for at least the previous three consecutive calendar years; and(2) is located more than 25 miles of travel distance on a roadway from another hospital located in this Commonwealth."Health care provider." As defined in section 103 of the act of March 20, 2002 (P.L.154, No.13), known as the Medical Care Availability and Reduction of Error (Mcare) Act."Hospital." As defined in section 802.1 of the Health Care Facilities Act."Maternal Health Index." An indicator of the health of a patient as determined by the patient's health care provider, who considers the following factors:(1) Prepregnancy obesity.(2) Prepregnancy diabetes.(3) Prepregnancy hypertension.(4) Prenatal care initiation in the first trimester.(5) Cigarette smoking.(6) Behavioral health factors."Maternal Vulnerability Index." The measure of 43 county-level social indicators, as published in the August 20, 2021, report, updated June 22, 2022, entitled Getting Hyperlocal to Improve Outcomes & Achieve Racial Equity in Maternal Health: The U.S. Maternal Vulnerability Index, published by Surgo Ventures."Maternity care desert." An area that does not have any of the following:20250HB0432PN0416 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Hospitals providing obstetric care.(2) Birth centers.(3) Obstetrician gynecologists.(4) Certified nurse midwives."Maternity emergency services." Care provided by a health care provider to a pregnant or postpartum patient as a result of one or more of the following symptoms:(1) Chest pain.(2) Decrease in fetal movement.(3) Dizziness.(4) Vomiting.(5) Heavy vaginal bleeding.(6) Loss of consciousness.(7) Seizures.(8) Severe abdominal pain or cramping.(9) Severe headache.(10) Sudden, spontaneous delivery.(11) Sudden swelling in the arms, legs or face.(12) Sudden changes in vision.(13) Shortness of breath.(14) High blood pressure."Patient." As defined in section 103 of the Medical Care Availability and Reduction of Error (Mcare) Act."Program." The Maternal Care Access Program established under section 3."Social Vulnerability Index." The following demographic and socioeconomic criteria, as provided in the most recent census data published by the United States Census Bureau and employed by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention to determine adversely affected communities, that the department uses to 20250HB0432PN0416 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 designate a zone in section 4(b):(1) Percentage of population that is unemployed.(2) Percentage of population without a high school diploma.(3) Percentage of population without health insurance.(4) Percentage of population with income at or below 150% of the Federal poverty level.(5) Percentage of households 65 years of age and older.(6) Percentage of households aged 17 and younger.(7) Percentage of households with individuals with a disability.(8) Percentage of single-parent households.(9) English language proficiency.(10) Racial and ethnic minority population.(11) Number of mobile homes.(12) Number of multiunit housing structures.(13) Number of households without a vehicle.(14) Housing crowding.(15) Group quarters."Zone." A maternal care access zone established under section 4.Section 3. Maternal Care Access Program.(a) Establishment.--The Maternal Care Access Program is established in the department for the purpose of identifying counties in this Commonwealth that would benefit from increased access to skilled and licensed maternal health care providers and resources to improve maternal health outcomes. The department may promulgate regulations necessary for the implementation of the program.(b) Oversight.--The department may assign oversight 20250HB0432PN0416 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 authority of the program to another office or program in the department.(c) Program resources.--The program may only distribute resources to birth centers, obstetrician gynecologists, certified nurse midwives or county health departments or hospitals providing obstetric care in zones designated in this act.Section 4. Maternal care access zones.(a) Designation.--A county that meets the specified qualifications in this section may be designated by the department as a zone. The department may determine whether a zone is considered at-risk or a maternity care desert.(b) Qualifications.--The department shall consider the following criteria when designating a zone as either at-risk or a maternity care desert:(1) The ratio of females of average childbearing age to full-time equivalent maternity health care providers.(2) The percentage of females of average childbearing age with income at or below 200% of the Federal poverty level.(3) Travel time and distance to the nearest health care provider trained and licensed to provide the necessary care, considering the ideal travel distance should be no more than 30 minutes to the nearest obstetric facility and within a 9.7-mile radius from home during the third trimester.(4) The Social Vulnerability Index.(5) Lack of maternity emergency services.(6) The Maternal Health Index.(7) The number of distressed hospitals in the area.(8) The number of health care providers of color in the 20250HB0432PN0416 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 area.(9) The maternal mortality rate.(10) The percentage of births covered by Medicaid.(11) The number of birth centers in the area.(12) Total number of obstetrician gynecologists in the area.(13) The number of certified nurse midwives in the area.(14) The Maternal Vulnerability Index.(15) The number of births per day in the area and the number of skilled and licensed maternal health care providers per birth.(c) Scoring.--The department shall provide scoring for all counties in this Commonwealth based on the criteria specified in this section. The scoring of criteria shall determine the need for designation as a zone and whether a zone is considered to be at-risk or a maternity care desert. An at-risk county shall have a lower score and a maternity care desert shall have a higher score. The department shall determine the scoring parameters.(d) Reporting.--A hospital shall report the criteria under this section to the appropriate county health department or the department. The county health department shall report the criteria under this section to the department.Section 5. Regions.(a) Establishment.--The following regions are established throughout this Commonwealth for the purpose of resource distribution:(1) Region 1 shall consist of Cameron, Clarion, Crawford, Elk, Erie, Forest, McKean, Mercer, Potter, Venango, and Warren Counties.(2) Region 2 shall consist of Allegheny, Armstrong, 20250HB0432PN0416 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Beaver, Butler, Cambria, Fayette, Greene, Indiana, Jefferson, Lawrence, Somerset, Washington and Westmoreland Counties.(3) Region 3 shall consist of Adams, Bedford, Cumberland, Dauphin, Franklin, Fulton, Huntingdon, Juniata, Lancaster, Lebanon, Mifflin, Perry and York Counties.(4) Region 4 shall consist of Blair, Bradford, Centre, Clearfield, Clinton, Columbia, Lycoming, Montour, Northumberland, Snyder, Tioga, Union and Sullivan Counties.(5) Region 5 shall consist of Carbon, Lackawanna, Lehigh, Luzerne, Monroe, Northampton, Pike, Schuylkill, Susquehanna, Wyoming and Wayne Counties.(6) Region 6 shall consist of Berks, Bucks, Chester, Delaware, Montgomery and Philadelphia Counties.(b) Resource distribution.--The department shall equitably distribute resources to the regions specified in this section.Section 6. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250HB0432PN0416 - 7 - 1234567891011121314151617